Maryland, session 2026, HB0484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–305.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0484*

HOUSE BILL 484
(a) To the extent excluded from federal taxable income, the amounts under this
section are added to the federal taxable income of a corporation to determine Maryland
modified income.
(E) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “COVERED DRUG” MEANS:
1. A PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRODUCT AS DEFINED IN §
735 OF THE FEDERAL FOOD, DRUG, AND COSMETIC ACT; OR
2. A DRUG COMPOUNDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 503A
OR § 503B OF THE FEDERAL FOOD, DRUG, AND COSMETIC ACT.
(III) “COVERED ENTITY” MEANS:
1. A SPONSOR OF A PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRODUCT AS
DEFINED IN § 735 OF THE FEDERAL FOOD, DRUG, AND COSMETIC ACT; OR
2. A PERSON THAT, EITHER DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY
THROUGH A SUBSIDIARY, OWNS AN OUTSOURCING FACILITY AS DEFINED IN § 503B
OF THE FEDERAL FOOD, DRUG, AND COSMETIC ACT.
(IV) 1. “DIRECT–TO–CONSUMER ADVERTISING” MEANS ANY
DISSEMINATION, BY OR ON BEHALF OF A COVERED ENTITY, OF AN ADVERTISEMENT
THAT IS IN REGARD TO A COVERED DRUG AND PRIMARILY TARGETED TO THE
GENERAL PUBLIC, INCLUDING THROUGH:
A. BROADCASTING THROUGH MEDIA SUCH AS RADIO,
TELEVISION, TELEPHONE COMMUNICATION SYSTEMS, DIRECT MAIL, AND
BILLBOARDS; AND
B. DISSEMINATION ON THE INTERNET OR THROUGH
DIGITAL PLATFORMS, INCLUDING SOCIAL MEDIA, MOBILE MEDIA, WEB
APPLICATIONS, DIGITAL APPLICATIONS, MOBILE APPLICATIONS, AND ELECTRONIC
APPLICATIONS.
2. “DIRECT–TO–CONSUMER ADVERTISING” DOES NOT
INCLUDE AN ADVERTISEMENT MADE THROUGH PUBLICATION IN JOURNALS AND
OTHER PERIODICALS.
(2) THE ADDITION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
INCLUDES ANY EXPENSES PAID OR INCURRED DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR THAT ARE

HOUSE BILL 484 3
DEDUCTED UNDER § 162 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR
DIRECT–TO–CONSUMER ADVERTISING OF COVERED DRUGS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.